Idaho, session 2026, H0559.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 63-3004, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3004. INTERNAL REVENUE CODE. The term "Internal Revenue Code"
means the Internal Revenue Code as amended and in effect on the first day of
January 2025 2026, except that:
(1) Internal Revenue Code section 85 is applied as in effect on January
1, 2020; and
(2) Specified research or experimental expenditures, as defined in
section 174 of the Internal Revenue Code as in effect on December 31, 2024,
incurred in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, and before
January 1, 2025, shall continue to be expensed under the Internal Revenue
Code provisions as in effect immediately before the enactment of section
70302 of P.L. 119-21, rather than under the provisions of section 70302 of
P.L. 119-21.
SECTION 2. That Section 63-3022O, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3022O. ADJUSTMENT -- PROPERTY ACQUIRED AFTER SEPTEMBER 10, 2001 --
SMALL BUSINESS EXPENSES -- LIMITATIONS ON ASSESSMENTS AND REFUNDS. For tax-
able years commencing on and after January 1, 2001, in computing Idaho tax-
able income:
(1)(a) The adjusted basis of depreciable property, depreciation, and
gains and losses from sale, exchange, or other disposition of deprecia-
ble property acquired after September 10, 2001, and before December 31,
2007, shall be computed without regard to the bonus depreciation avail-
able under subsection subsections (k) and (n) of section 168 of the In-
ternal Revenue Code and the adjusted basis of depreciable property, de-
preciation, and gains and losses from sale, exchange, or other dispo-
sition of depreciable property acquired after December 31, 2009, shall
be computed without regard to subsection subsections (k) and (n) of sec-
tion 168 of the Internal Revenue Code, provided that to the extent a tax-
payer cannot use the additional depreciation claimed under subsection


subsections (k) and (n) of section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code in
the current year for federal income tax purposes because of loss limita-
tions imposed by sections 465, 469, 704(d), and 1366(d) of the Internal
Revenue Code, then such additional depreciation shall not be added back
to federal taxable income in order to determine Idaho taxable income in
the current year, and the current and subsequent year bonus deprecia-
tion adjustments shall be suspended and the add-back and subtractions
shall be applied as provided in this subsection.
(b) In subsequent taxable years, the additional depreciation that was
not added back to federal taxable income in the year it originated as
provided in this subsection shall be added back when a prior loss that
has been suspended under section 465, 469, 704(d), or 1366(d) of the In-
ternal Revenue Code is deducted for federal income tax purposes in the
following manner:
(i) Bonus depreciation deducted for federal income tax purposes
shall be added back to Idaho taxable income as the losses suspended
under sections 465, 469, 704(d), and 1366(d) of the Internal Rev-
enue Code are utilized, after the utilization of all losses other
than those attributable to bonus depreciation;
(ii) The amount of the bonus depreciation add-back shall be the
full amount of the add-back less the cumulative allowable depreci-
ation amounts for Idaho purposes. If, because of the limitations
of sections 465, 469, 704(d), and 1366(d) of the Internal Revenue
Code, there is a partial net add-back, then the net add-back amount
for future periods will be adjusted to reflect the amount that was
actually added back;
(iii) After the add-back or net add-back has been fully added back
to Idaho taxable income, the taxpayer may take the remaining de-
ductions over the life of the asset regardless of the limitations
under sections 465, 469, 704(d), and 1366(d) of the Internal Rev-
enue Code;
(iv) In the event of a disposition of a pass-through entity's own-
ership interest, adjustments shall be made to the tax basis of the
owner's interest of the pass-through entity to ensure there is no
double deduction of expense or double inclusion of income. The ba-
sis referred to in this subparagraph is the basis to the new owner
in his ownership interest or the basis to the owner who disposed of
this ownership interest, as applicable; and
(v) In the event of a disposition of a pass-through entity's as-
sets for which bonus depreciation was elected before the add-back
was fully realized, adjustments shall be made to ensure there is no
double deduction of expense or double inclusion of income.
(c) For determining the Idaho adjusted income for part-year residents
or nonresidents:
(i) When a loss under section 465, 469, 704(d), or 1366(d) of
the Internal Revenue Code is deducted for federal purposes and is
sourced to Idaho, the additional depreciation that was not added
back in the year it originated as provided in paragraph (a) of this
subsection shall be added back in subsequent years based on the ap-


portionment factor in the year the bonus depreciation originated;
and
(ii) When a loss under section 465, 469, 704(d), or 1366(d) of the
Internal Revenue Code is not sourced to Idaho, the add-back of ad-
ditional depreciation shall be made in the current taxable year,
notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsec-
tion.
(2) The loss limitations imposed by sections 465, 469, 704(d), and
1366(d) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be calculated without regard
to depreciation claimed for federal tax purposes pursuant to subsection
subsections (k) and (n) of section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(3) Each partner, shareholder, member, or beneficiary shall include in
Idaho taxable income his share of the adjustments required by this section in
computing Idaho taxable income of any pass-through entity.
(4) In recognition of the fact that a taxpayer affected by this section
may have a different tax basis in his pass-through entity interest and a
different carryover of loss limitations and amount at risk for Idaho tax pur-
poses than for federal tax purposes, each partner, shareholder, member, or
beneficiary of any pass-through entity that claims the additional deprecia-
tion pursuant to subsection subsections (k) and (n) of section 168 of the In-
ternal Revenue Code shall keep records of the Idaho tax basis of his interest
in the pass-through entity, the amount at risk, and the balance of his carry-
over of Idaho loss limitations in order to confirm that the partner, share-
holder, member, or beneficiary, or any successor of his interest by purchase
or other means, does not receive directly or indirectly any Idaho income
tax benefit from the additional depreciation available under subsection
subsections (k) and (n) of section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(5) Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 63-3068 and 63-3072,
Idaho Code, the period of limitations for issuing a notice of deficiency de-
termination or filing a claim for refund for any year for which an adjustment
is required by this section shall not expire before three (3) years from the
later of: (a) the due date of the return for the last taxable year an adjust-
ment was required by this section; or (b) the date the return was filed for
the last taxable year an adjustment was required by this section. Upon the
expiration of the period of limitations as provided in subsections (a) and
(m) of section 63-3068, Idaho Code, and subsections (b) and (h) of section
63-3072, Idaho Code, only those specific items of basis, deductions, gains,
or losses that are computed without regard to subsection subsections (k) and
(n) of section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code, as required by this section,
shall be subject to adjustment, as well as the effect of such adjustments on
Idaho credits, net operating loss deductions, and capital loss carryovers.
SECTION 3. That Section 63-3029G, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3029G. CREDITS FOR RESEARCH ACTIVITIES CONDUCTED IN THIS STATE --
CARRYFORWARD.
(1)(a) Subject to the limitations of this section, there shall be al-
lowed to a taxpayer a nonrefundable credit against taxes imposed by sec-
tions 63-3024, 63-3025, and 63-3025A, Idaho Code, for increasing re-
search activities in Idaho.


(b) The credit allowed by paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be the
sum of:
(i) Five percent (5%) of the excess of qualified research ex-
penses for research conducted in Idaho over the base amount; and
(ii) Five percent (5%) basic research payments allowable under
section 41(e) of the Internal Revenue Code for basic research con-
ducted in Idaho.
(c) The credit allowed by paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be com-
puted without regard to the calculation of the alternative incremental
credit provided for in section 41(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code or
the alternative simplified credit provided for in section 41(c)(5) of
the Internal Revenue Code.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) The terms "qualified research expenses," "qualified research,"
"basic research payments" and "basic research" shall be as defined in
section 41 of the Internal Revenue Code, except that the research must
be conducted in Idaho.
(b) The term "base amount" shall mean an amount calculated as provided
in section 41(c) and (h) of the Internal Revenue Code, except that:
(i) A taxpayer's gross receipts include only those gross receipts
attributable to sources within this state as provided in subsec-
tions (12) and (13) of section 63-3027, Idaho Code; and
(ii) Notwithstanding section 41(c) of the Internal Revenue Code,
for purposes of calculating the base amount, a taxpayer:
(A) May elect to be treated as a start-up company as provided
in section 41(c)(3)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, regard-
less of whether the taxpayer meets the requirements of sec-
tion 41(c)(3)(B)(i)(I) or (II) of the Internal Revenue Code;
and
(B) May not revoke an election to be treated as a start-up
company.
(3) The credit allowed by subsection (1)(a) of this section together
with any credits carried forward under subsection (5) of this section
shall not exceed the amount of tax due under sections 63-3024, 63-3025, and
63-3025A, Idaho Code, after allowance for all other credits permitted by
this chapter. When credits earned in more than one (1) taxable year are
available, the oldest credits shall be applied first.
(4) In the case of a group of corporations filing a combined report
under section 63-3027(22), Idaho Code, credit earned by one (1) member of
the group but not used by that member may be used by another member of the
group. For a combined group of corporations, any member of the group may
claim credit carried forward unless the member who earned the credit is no
longer included in the combined group.
(5) The credit allowed by subsection (1)(a) of this section shall be
claimed for the taxable year during which the taxpayer qualifies for the
credit. If the credit exceeds the limitation under subsection (3) of this
section, the excess amount may be carried forward for a period that does not
exceed the next fourteen (14) taxable years. Any amounts deducted or amor-
tized by a taxpayer pursuant to section 174 or 174A of the Internal Revenue
Code that constitute qualified research expenses, qualified research, basic


research payments, or basic research, as those terms are defined in subsec-
tion (2) of this section, shall not be eligible for the credit provided in
this section.
(6) In addition to other needed rules, the state tax commission may
promulgate rules prescribing, in the case of S corporations, partnerships,
trusts, or estates, a method of attributing the credit under this section to
the shareholders, partners, or beneficiaries in proportion to their share of
the income from the S corporation, partnership, trust, or estate.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval, and retroactively to January 1, 2025.